Washington statutes.
RCW 36.89.062

Power and authority of counties are supplemental.

The power and authority conferred upon counties by this chapter and RCW 86.12.020 shall be in addition and supplemental to those already granted and shall not limit any other powers or authority of such counties.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 30 s 13.]